Utah statutes.
53A-17a-163.    Performance-based Compensation Pilot Program.

(1)  The Performance-based Compensation Pilot Program is created to pilot the development and implementation of performance-based compensation plans for elementary school classroom-related staff.

(2)  From money appropriated by the Legislature for the Performance-based Compensation Pilot Program, the State Board of Education shall award grants to school districts and charter schools to develop and implement performance-based compensation plans for elementary school classroom-related staff.

(3)  The State Board of Education shall:

(a)  solicit proposals from school districts and charter schools for the use of grant money to develop and implement performance-based compensation plans for elementary school classroom-related staff; and

(b)  award grants on a competitive basis.

(4)  To receive a grant, a school district or charter school shall submit a proposal to the State Board of Education to develop and implement a performance-based compensation plan over a two-year period as follows:

(a)  In the first year, the school district or charter school shall develop, administer, and evaluate performance measures.

(b)  In the second year, the school district or charter school shall administer performance measures and compensate classroom-related staff based on performance.

(c)  A performance-based compensation plan shall provide that:

(i)  student learning gains shall account for 40% of the maximum amount of performance-based compensation that may be awarded to an employee;

(ii)  an employee's instructional quality or performance as measured by classroom observations or other instruments shall account for 40% of the maximum amount of performance-based compensation that may be awarded to an employee; and

(iii)  the remaining 20% of the maximum amount that may be awarded to an employee shall include a measure of parent, student, or community satisfaction.

(d)  A proposal shall include a budget and specify the amount of grant money requested.

(e)  A school district's proposal may apply to one or more elementary schools within the district.



Enacted by Chapter 299, 2009 General Session

